Louisiana, session 2026, SB197.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:312.1(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§312.1. Circuit court of appeal; domicile; number of judges; election
* * *
D. The Court of Appeal for the Fourth Circuit, domiciled in the city of New
Orleans, shall have twelve ten judges. Eight Seven judges shall be elected from the
first district of the fourth circuit by the qualified electors thereof. One judge shall be
elected from the second district by the qualified electors thereof. One judge shall be
elected from the third district by the qualified electors thereof. Two judges One
judge shall be elected from the circuit at large by the qualified electors thereof.
* * *
Section 2. No provision of this Act shall deprive any judge in office of the ability to
serve the entire remainder of his or her term. To effectuate the provisions of this Act, no
further elections shall be held for Division G of the first district of the fourth circuit or for
the at large seat currently held by Chief Judge Roland Belsome with a term expiring on
December 31, 2031, whether at the end of the current term or due to a vacancy caused by the
death, resignation, retirement, or incapacity of the judge.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 197 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.